Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Chapter 17. County Auditors

§ 19-17-1.
The clerk is county auditor.

The clerk of the board of supervisors is the county auditor, and he shall perform the duties of auditor as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 326; 1906, § 347; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3720; 1930, § 295; 1942, § 3003.

§ 19-17-3.
To keep certain ledger accounts.

The county auditor shall keep a well-bound book, in which he shall keep an account with each county office, and with the courthouse, jail, and poorhouse, and wherein he shall enter allowances for each. He shall keep accounts of allowances made for mileage and pay of the members of the board of supervisors and of jurors, and of witnesses for the state, each separately, as well as expenditures on account of each part of every public road under a separate contract or other separate link.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 328; 1906, § 349; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3722; 1930, § 296; 1942, § 3004.

§ 19-17-5.
To keep depository funds ledger.

The county auditor shall keep, as a record in his office, a book to be styled “depository funds ledger” in which he shall record all receipts and disbursements of county funds, and he shall compare and reconcile said “depository funds ledger” with the depository’s report of funds of the county on deposit, as shown by such report, quarterly and/or at such other times, as may be required by the board of supervisors.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 329; 1906, § 350; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3723; 1930, § 297; 1942, § 3005; Laws, 1946, ch. 337.

§ 19-17-7.
To keep accounts of officers.

The county auditor shall keep a suitable book, in which he shall enter the accounts of all officers whose duty it is to receive or collect any money for the county, exhibiting the debits and credits, and what they represent, whether money, warrants, or bonds, and whether belonging to the general or any special fund. Such book shall be at all times subject to the inspection of any citizen of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2164; 1892, § 330; 1906, § 351; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3724; 1930, § 298; 1942, § 3006.

§ 19-17-9.
To issue receipt warrants.

It shall be the duty of the county auditor to issue his receipt warrant to any person desiring to pay money into the county treasury, specifying the amount and the particular account on which such payment is to be made, and the fund to which it belongs. However, a receipt warrant shall not be credited to the person making such payment, nor be charged to the county depository, until there shall be produced and filed with such auditor a duplicate receipt, signed by the depository, for the sum specified in such receipt warrant.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2174; 1892, § 331; 1906, § 352; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3725; 1930, § 299; 1942, § 3007.

§ 19-17-11.
To settle with officers, and exact payment.

The county auditor shall examine, audit and settle the accounts of the collector of taxes payable into the county treasury, and of all officers receiving funds payable into such treasury, and shall require all sums due from any officer to be paid into the county depository on the day such funds are collected or on the next business day thereafter. In all cases, on issuing his receipt warrant for the payment of any money into the county treasury, he shall charge the person to whom the warrant is issued with its amount, if not before charged to such person; and on presentation to him of the duplicate receipt of the county depository, he shall charge it with such sum, and credit the person to whom the receipt warrant was issued with the sum. If any officer whose duty it is to make any payment into the county treasury shall fail to do so as prescribed by law, the county auditor or the board of supervisors shall forthwith institute suit against the officer on his official bond for such default.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2166; 1892, § 332; 1906, § 353; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3726; 1930, § 300; 1942, § 3008; Laws, 1985, ch. 514, § 14; Laws, 1986, ch. 305, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 27, 1986).

§ 19-17-13.
To debit and credit tax collector with county taxes.

It shall be the duty of the clerk, as county auditor, on delivering the assessment rolls to the tax collector, to charge him with the full amount of all taxes required to be paid into the county treasury, as shown by the rolls and the law, or by the order of the board of supervisors levying county taxes, and in settling with him to charge him with any additional assessments on the rolls due the county that may have been made, and to credit him only with such payments as he shall have made, according to law, into said treasury, and with such legal allowances as shall have been made to him by the board of supervisors, or as are fixed by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2167; 1892, § 333; 1906, § 354; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3727; 1930, § 301; 1942, § 3009.

§ 19-17-15.
To charge appropriate officer with jury taxes, fines, penalties, and forfeitures.

It shall be the duty of the clerk, on receiving from the circuit court the list of jury taxes accrued at any term of the circuit court, and of the fines, penalties and forfeitures imposed or accrued at each term of the court, at once, as county auditor, to charge the sheriff of the county, or the person acting as such for the time, with the full amount of such jury taxes, fines, penalties, and forfeitures, and to require the sheriff, or the person acting as such, to pay the amount into the county treasury, except such as he shall show a legal excuse for not collecting and paying.

When a fine, penalty, or forfeiture shall be imposed by any court of which he is a clerk, he shall, as county auditor, at once charge such sum to the proper officer, and require its payment into the county treasury.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, §§ 2168, 2169; 1892, §§ 334, 335; 1906, §§ 355, 356; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 3728, 3729; 1930, §§ 302, 303; 1942, §§ 3010, 3011.

§ 19-17-17.
To examine books of officers and make proper charges; report to grand jury.

The clerk of the board of supervisors, as county auditor, is authorized and required to examine the accounts, dockets and records of clerks, sheriffs and other officers of his county, to ascertain if any money payable into the county treasury is properly chargeable to them, and he shall charge them with such money. It shall be his duty to make written report, under oath, to each regular session of the grand jury setting forth the conditions as found by said examination, and any failure to make such report shall be a misdemeanor, and upon conviction for same he shall be fined not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) nor more than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2171; 1892, § 336; 1906, § 357; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3730; 1930, § 304; 1942, § 3012; Laws, 1914, ch. 237.

§ 19-17-19.
To report defaulting officers.

If any justice of the peace, or other officer required by law to make report or furnish a list to the clerk of the board of supervisors, or to make payment of any money accruing to the county or state and payable into the county treasury, shall fail to make such report or furnish such list, or if the county depository shall fail to bring all moneys or certificates of deposit belonging to the county treasury to the board of supervisors to be counted by the board as required by law, it shall be the duty of the clerk, as county auditor, to report such delinquent in writing, to the grand jury, and also to the district attorney, for the institution of legal proceedings for the default.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2172; Laws, 1982, § 338; 1906, § 359; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3732; 1930, § 305; 1942, § 3013.

§ 19-17-21.
To credit and report on poll tax.

It shall be the duty of the county auditor to place to the credit of the public school fund of the county all sums of money paid into the county treasury arising from the state Two Dollars ($2.00) poll tax, and, on the first day of October and April of each fiscal year, he shall report to the county superintendent of public education and the auditor of public accounts the amount of such credit during the preceding six months.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 2173; 1892, § 339; 1906, § 360; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3733; 1930, § 306, 1942, § 3014.